Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-312
Over-the-counter spectacles.

The lenses in over-the-counter spectacles shall be of uniform focus power in each eye and shall not exceed +3.25 diopters.

Laws 2016, LB235, § 5.